Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
State Planning

147.070.
State planning functions of Governor’s Cabinet.

The Governor’s Cabinet shall:

Prepare and adopt plans for complete systems of state or regional highways, expressways, parkways, parks, water supply and forest reservations, airways and air terminals, and other things of significance in furthering a well balanced development of the state.

Advise with state agencies, local authorities and individuals with a view to the coordination of all physical development plans that are related to state activities.

Make surveys of rural land utilization with a view to the determination of the areas suitable for field crops, reforestation, watershed protection, recreation and urban expansion.

Draft for submission to the General Assembly such regulations affecting the use and development of property as are deemed reasonable and necessary for orderly and coordinated developments preserving the integrity of officially approved plans or conserving the natural resources of the state.

Collect and publish information relating to welfare problems affecting the people of the state and make such recommendations on those problems to the General Assembly as may seem advisable and proper.

Cooperate with planning boards of other states and the national planning board.

Act as a research broker in assisting state government to meet its research needs and to perform such functions also upon request from local governments.

The cabinet shall have such powers as are necessary to promote state planning and to enable it to carry out the purposes of KRS 147.070 to 147.100.

All public officials shall upon request furnish to the Governor’s Cabinet, within a reasonable time, such available information as it may require for its work. The members and employees of the cabinet may, in the performance of their functions, enter upon any land, make examinations and surveys and place and maintain necessary monuments and marks thereon.

Every state officer or agency, before requesting legislative or executive approval of a plan or authorization of an appropriation for a major public improvement related to or affected by any general plan prepared under authority of KRS 147.070 to 147.100, or before requesting a change of use or disposition of real property that is owned by the state or in which the state has an interest, shall make a written request to the Governor’s Cabinet for its recommendations, and shall give the cabinet a reasonable opportunity to study and make its recommendations thereon.

History.
1992c-2: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 299, § 10.

147.072.
Office for program administration — Organization and duties. [Repealed.]

147.075.
State Planning Committee.

As used in KRS 147.070 to 147.120 the term “Governor’s Cabinet” shall mean the “Governor’s Executive Cabinet” and such other persons as the Governor may designate to compose the membership of the “State Planning Committee.” The Governor shall serve as chairman of the State Planning Committee, and shall appoint a vice chairman from committee membership at his or her discretion. The special assistant to the Governor for budget and management shall serve as secretary.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. VIII, J, § 1; 1976, ch. 299, § 12; 1978, ch. 155, § 66, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 295, § 18, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 396, § 11, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 186, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 2004, ch. 105, § 1, effective July 13, 2004.

147.080.
Plans for development of state highways and parkways. [Repealed.]

147.090.
Preparation and coordination of major state improvement projects.

The Governor’s Cabinet shall prepare and keep up to date a long-term development program of major state improvement projects. The various state agencies and officers shall prepare and submit to the cabinet their proposals for major projects. The cabinet shall coordinate such plans and proposals with each other and with the general plans of the cabinet, and as a result submit to the Governor and General Assembly a report at least once every two (2) years, showing the cabinet’s recommendations and program for improvement projects.

History.
1992c-4.

147.100.
Miscellaneous projects.

The Governor’s Cabinet may make maps, planning studies and surveys relating to zoning, soil conditions, land use and classification, population distribution, schools, park and playground development, port, harbor and waterway work, parkways, highways, traffic, transit, water supply, drainage and sewerage, long-range financial programs, real property inventories, tax maps, building and housing conditions, subdivision control, and other subjects affecting the general health and welfare.

History.
1992c-5.

147.110.
Use of federal funds and state planning funds.

Department heads and cabinet secretaries may accept any funds provided by the United States government or any agency thereof for the purposes defined in KRS 147.070 to 147.100. The state planning committee may allocate funds appropriated to the state planning fund to agencies for the purpose of matching federal funds which may be available for planning purposes.

History.
1992c-6: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 190, § 2.

147.120.
Records — Employees — Expenses.

The Governor’s Cabinet shall keep permanent and complete records of its proceedings, orders and decisions, and may employ persons necessary to the exercise of its functions, under KRS 147.070 to 147.100, and pay their compensation and incur any necessary expenses, within the limits of any funds provided by the United States government.

History.
1992c-1.

147.130.
Creation and membership of regional planning commission. [Repealed.]

147.140.
City planning law applies; finances of commission. [Repealed.]

147.150.
Powers and duties of the commission. [Repealed.]

147.160.
Certification of regional plan. [Repealed.]

147.170.
Adoption of regional plan by cities. [Repealed.]

147.180.
Structures subject to plan must be approved. [Repealed.]

147.190.
Creation and purpose of Capital Planning and Zoning Commission. [Repealed.]

147.200.
Membership of commission. [Repealed.]

147.210.
Bylaws; regulations;
quorum. [Repealed.]

147.220.
Powers and duties of commission; scope of operation; master plan; zoning plan and regulations; subdivision control regulations. [Repealed.]

147.230.
Employment of assistants by commission; expenses. [Repealed.]

147.240.
Power of eminent domain; acquisition of property. [Repealed.]

147.245.
Board of zoning adjustment and appeals. [Repealed.]

147.246.
Powers, duties and procedures of board. [Repealed.]

147.247.
Appeals. [Repealed.]

147.250.
Regulations, effect of; penalties. [Repealed.]

147.260.
Agricultural and Industrial Development Board created; membership;
chairman, qualifications; expenses; meetings; director; personnel. [Repealed.]

147.270.
Board to carry on program of research, publicity and advertising; coordinate activities of other agencies; encourage private organizations. [Repealed.]

147.280.
Assembling and giving out of information concerning resources and facilities; information as to enterprises proposing to locate in Kentucky. [Repealed.]

147.290.
Publication of maps, studies and surveys. [Repealed.]

147.300.
Cooperation with other agencies and governmental units; studies of land utilization and physical and economic development. [Repealed.]

147.310.
Powers of board as to public improvement projects involving capital outlay. [Repealed.]

147.320.
Legislative intent. [Repealed.]

147.330.
Council for land use planning created — Membership. [Repealed.]

147.340.
Qualifications of members — Organization — Meetings. [Repealed.]

147.350.
Duties of council — Reports. [Repealed.]

147.360.
Authorization for acceptance of gifts and grants. [Repealed.]

147.410.
Creation and purpose of Capital Planning and Zoning Commission. [Repealed.]

147.420.
Commission membership; expenses. [Repealed.]

147.430.
Bylaws and regulations. [Repealed.]

147.440.
Commission organization. [Repealed.]

147.450.
Commission personnel. [Repealed.]

147.460.
Fiscal provisions; debt limit. [Repealed.]

147.470.
Appropriation of money by governmental units. [Repealed.]

147.480.
Commission functions. [Repealed.]

147.490.
Agricultural uses. [Repealed.]

147.500.
Preparation and promotion of master plan. [Repealed.]

147.510.
Transition to operation under KRS 147.410 to 147.570. [Repealed.]

147.520.
Power of eminent domain. [Repealed.]

147.530.
Legal counsel. [Repealed.]

147.540.
Board of zoning adjustment and appeals. [Repealed.]

147.550.
Zoning permits and certificates. [Repealed.]

147.560.
Appeals. [Repealed.]

147.570.
Effect of regulations;
penalties. [Repealed.]